California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
-------------------------------------------

4350.5.

(a) School districts or county superintendents of schools proposing to serve as grant recipients pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4348 shall perform the functions described in subdivision (a) of Section 4350. 

(b) The county office of education or school district subject to subdivision (a) shall ensure the provision of adequate initial and ongoing case consultation and training for child aides at regular intervals at each program site from qualified mental health professionals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 10.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4351.

The department shall provide for training of program personnel. Funds for this purpose may be appropriated under Section 11489 of the Health and Safety Code, through other special funds, or through the state budget. Training of program personnel may be contracted out to programs designated by the State Department of Mental Health appropriate to provide these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 11.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4352.

(a) The State Department of Mental Health shall conduct a review of each primary intervention program at least once during the first year of funding, and thereafter as necessary. 

(b) The purposes of the reviews are program improvement and compliance with the guidelines set forth in this chapter. The review procedure shall be adequately flexible for application to primary intervention programs of varying sizes and models. 

(c) The State Department of Mental Health may contract for the conducting of reviews with programs appropriate for providing these services. Funds may be appropriated for this purpose pursuant to Section 11489 of the Health and Safety Code, from other special funds, or through the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 12.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4352.5.

Up to 10 percent of the total state funds available annually for the primary intervention program from all sources may be utilized by the department for administration, training, consultation, and evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 13.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Persons With Acquired Traumatic Brain Injury [4353. - 4358.5.]

4353.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is a large population of persons who have suffered traumatic brain injuries resulting in significant functional impairment. The annual number of brain injuries is greater than the rates of breast cancer, heart attack, lung cancer, HIV and AIDS, spinal cord injuries, and multiple sclerosis combined.

(b) Roughly 28 percent of all brain injuries are due to a fall, and 20 percent are due to motor vehicle accidents. Those injuries attributable to motor vehicle accidents, however, account for the greatest number of hospitalizations.

(c) There is a lack of awareness of the problems associated with brain injury as a chronic health condition resulting in a significant absence of community reintegration services for persons with brain injuries, including, but not limited to, in-home and out-of-home services, respite care, placement programs, counseling, cognitive rehabilitation, transitional living, and vocational rehabilitation services.

(d) Although there are currently a number of different programs attempting to meet the needs of the persons with brain injuries in the field of community reintegration, there is no clearly defined ultimate responsibility vested in any single state agency. This section does not mandate services for persons with acquired traumatic brain injury through county and city
 programs.

(e) While formal standards of care exist for both medical and rehabilitative models within the system of brain injury care, the same cannot be said with regard to community reintegration services. Currently, there is no programmatic coordination among agencies to facilitate the provision of a continuing range of services appropriate for persons with traumatic brain injuries.

(f) There is a serious gap in postacute care services for the life of the brain injury survivor, resulting in incomplete recovery of functional potential.

(g) Due to the problems referred to in this section, the state is not adequately meeting the needs of persons with brain injuries by enabling them to return to work
 and to lead productive lives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4354.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Acquired traumatic brain injury” is an injury that is sustained after birth from an external force to the brain or any of its parts, resulting in cognitive, psychological, neurological, or anatomical changes in brain functions.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Rehabilitation.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Rehabilitation.

(d) (1) “Vocational supportive services” means a method of providing vocational rehabilitation and related services that
 may include prevocational and educational services to individuals who are unserved or underserved by existing vocational rehabilitation services.

(2) “Extended supported employment services” means ongoing support services and other appropriate services that are needed to support and maintain an individual with an acquired traumatic brain injury in supported employment following that individual’s transition from support provided as a vocational rehabilitation service, including job coaching, by the department, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 19150.

(e) The following four characteristics distinguish “vocational supportive services” from traditional methods of providing vocational rehabilitation and day activity services:

(1) Service recipients appear to lack the potential for
 unassisted competitive employment.

(2) Ongoing training, supervision, and support services must be provided.

(3) The opportunity is designed to provide the same benefits that other persons receive from work, including an adequate income level, quality of working life, security, and mobility.

(4) There is flexibility in the provision of support which is necessary to enable the person to function effectively at the worksite.

(f) “Community reintegration services” means services as needed by consumers, designed to develop, maintain, increase, or maximize independent functioning, with the goal of living in the community and participating in community life. These services may include, but are not limited to, providing, or arranging for access to, housing,
 transportation, medical care, rehabilitative therapies, day programs, chemical dependency recovery programs, personal assistance, and education.

(g) “Fund” means the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund.

(h) “Supported living services” means a range of appropriate supervision, support, and training in the consumer’s place of residence, designed to maximize independence.

(i) “Functional assessment” means measuring the level or degree of independence, amount of assistance required, and speed and safety considerations for a variety of categories, including activities of daily living, mobility, communication skills, psychosocial adjustment, and cognitive function.

(j) “Residence” means the place where a consumer makes his or her home, that may include, but is not
 limited to, a house or apartment where the consumer lives independently, assistive living arrangements, congregate housing, group homes, residential care facilities, transitional living programs, and nursing facilities.

(k) “Community rehabilitation program” shall have the same meaning as contained in subdivision (5) of Section 705 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4354.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Traumatic brain injuries have a long-term impact on the survivors, their families, caregivers, and support systems.

(b) Long-term care consumers experience great differences in service levels, eligibility criteria, and service availability, resulting in inappropriate and expensive care that fails to be responsive to their needs.

(c) To the maximum extent feasible, the department shall pursue all available sources of funding.

(d) If new sources of funding are secured
 that will permit expanding the existing Traumatic Brain Injury Program, the department shall fund an array of appropriate services and assistance to adults 18 years of age and older with traumatic brain injuries in those areas of the state with the greatest need.

(e) Implementation of this chapter shall be consistent with the state’s public policy strategy to design a coordinated services delivery system pursuant to Article 4.05 (commencing with Section 14139.05) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4355.

(a) On or before July 1, 2024, the department shall determine requirements related to service delivery, uniform data collection, and other aspects of program administration, in addition to those specified in Section 4357, that service providers participating in the traumatic brain injury program must meet. This may include, but is not limited to, requiring service providers to be approved as community reintegration
 programs eligible to serve consumers.

(b) On or before July 1, 2024, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine the level of funding necessary to permit a service provider to meet all applicable requirements and adequately serve its designated service area.

(2) Determine the number of sites that can be supported with available funding.

(3) If funding is available, solicit applications from new organizations interested in and qualified to
 provide services pursuant to this chapter, and select those best qualified to do so,
 with priority given to applicants that have proven experience in providing effective community reintegration services to persons with acquired traumatic brain injuries, including, but not limited to, supported living services, caregiver support, and family and community education.

(c) The department shall meet periodically with traumatic brain injury service providers for discussion of topics, including, but not limited to, the development and implementation of performance standards and data collection processes, eligibility requirements, program administration, pursuit of funding, and refinement of the traumatic brain injury continuum of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 402, Sec. 3.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4356.

Using data collected consistent with requirements established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4355, the department shall monitor and evaluate the performance of service providers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 439, Sec. 6.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4357.

(a) Service providers shall identify the needs of consumers and deliver services designed to meet those needs.

(b) Service providers shall match not less than 20 percent of the amount granted, with the exception of funds used for mentoring. The required match may be cash or in-kind contributions, or a combination of both, from the sites or any cooperating agency. In-kind contributions may include, but shall not be limited to, staff and volunteer services.

(c) Service providers shall provide at least 51 percent of their services under the grant to individuals who are Medi-Cal eligible or who have no other identified third-party funding source.

(d) (1) Service providers shall provide, directly or by arrangement, a coordinated service model to include all of the following:

(A) Supported living services.

(B) Community reintegration services.

(C) Vocational supportive services.

(D) Information, referral, and, as needed, assistance in identifying, accessing, utilizing, and coordinating all services needed by individuals with traumatic brain injury and their families.

(E) Public and professional education designed to facilitate early identification of persons with brain injury, prompt referral of these persons to appropriate services, and improvement
 of the system of services available to them.

(2) The model shall be designed and modified with advice from consumers and their families, and shall be accessible to the population in need, taking into account transportation, linguistic, and cultural factors.

(e) Service providers shall develop and utilize an individual service plan which will allow consumers to move from intensive medical rehabilitation or highly structured living arrangements to increased levels of independence and employment. The goals and priorities of each consumer shall be an integral part of his or her service plan.

(f) Service providers shall seek all third-party reimbursements for which consumers are eligible and shall utilize all services otherwise available to consumers at no cost, including vocational rehabilitation services provided by the
 department. However, grantees may utilize grant dollars for the purchase of nonreimbursed services or services otherwise unavailable to consumers.

(g) Service providers shall endeavor to serve a population that is broadly representative with regard to race and ethnicity of the population with traumatic brain injury in their geographical service area, undertaking outreach activities as needed to achieve this goal.

(h) Service providers shall maintain a broad network of relationships with local groups of brain injury survivors and families of survivors, as well as local providers of health, social, and vocational services to individuals with traumatic brain injury and their families. The sites shall work cooperatively with these groups and providers to improve and develop needed services and to promote a well-coordinated service system, taking a leadership role as necessary.

(i) Service providers shall furnish uniform data to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4355 as necessary to monitor and evaluate the program.

(j) Service providers wishing to continue to participate in the program after July 1, 2013, shall, by that date, be in compliance with additional eligibility requirements established by the department pursuant to Section 4355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 439, Sec. 7.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4357.1.

(a) The department may make grants from the funds in the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund, established in Section 4358, to service providers for the purpose of carrying out the programs detailed in this chapter.

(b) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter, including contracts required for administration or ancillary services in support of programs, shall be exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(c) Grants awarded to service providers pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to open competition every three years, unless the department elects
 to extend one or more grants and delay competition for those grants by a maximum of two additional years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 439, Sec. 8.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4358.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund, the moneys in which may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be expended for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 51.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4358.5.

Funds deposited into the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1464 of the Penal Code may be matched by federal vocational rehabilitation services funds for implementation of the Traumatic Brain Injury program pursuant to this chapter. However, this matching of funds shall occur only to the extent it is permitted by other state and federal law, and to the extent the matching of funds would be consistent with the policies and priorities of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 62.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Conditional Release Program [4360. - 4360.5.]

4360.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide mental health treatment and supervision in the community for judicially committed persons. The program established and administered by the department under this chapter to provide these services shall be known as the Forensic Conditional Release Program and may be used by the department in accordance with this section to provide services in the community to other patient populations for which the department has direct responsibility.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals may provide directly, or through contract with private providers or counties, for these services, including administrative and ancillary services related to the provision of direct services.
 These contracts shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services. Subject to approval by the State Department of State Hospitals, a county or private provider under contract to the department to provide these services may subcontract with private providers for those services.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 5328, programs providing services pursuant to this section may inform a local law enforcement agency of the names and addresses of program participants who reside within that agency’s jurisdiction. Providing notice under this subdivision does not relieve a person or entity of any statutory duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 121.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4360.5.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall establish a statewide panel of independent evaluators responsible for Forensic Conditional Release Program placement determinations for patients committed to the department and transitioning to community treatment settings for services pursuant to Section 4360.

(b) The purpose of the statewide independent placement panel is to identify state hospital patients who are ready for discharge to the Forensic Conditional Release Program pursuant to Section 4360, to promote successful community reintegration. The panel may consist of both contracted and civil service licensed psychologists and licensed social workers designated by the department. A licensed psychologist or licensed social worker panel
 member shall evaluate the state hospital patient to determine if the patient is suitable for community outpatient treatment and to determine whether an appropriate placement is available for the patient in the community-based treatment system based upon guidelines provided by the department, including the use of evidence-based risk assessment tools for all community release determinations. The panel member shall provide the court that has jurisdiction over the patient’s placement with a written placement recommendation on behalf of the statewide independent placement panel.

(c) (1) The statewide independent placement panel or designee shall be used to provide placement recommendations and conduct case reviews for patients committed to the State Department of State Hospitals on appropriateness for the Forensic Conditional Release Program.

(2) The department
 may designate the community program director, in lieu of the statewide independent placement panel, to perform case reviews and placement recommendations. The department shall notify the court of the designation.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(e) Contracts awarded pursuant to this statute are exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and are not subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 63.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Diversion Funding for Individuals with Serious Mental Disorders [4361. - 4361.]

4361.

(a) As used in this section, “department” means the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) The purpose of this chapter is to, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, promote the diversion of individuals with serious mental disorders as prescribed in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, and to assist counties in providing diversion for individuals with serious mental illnesses who have been found incompetent to stand trial for a felony charge. In implementing this chapter, the department shall consider local discretion and flexibility in diversion activities that meet the community’s needs and provide for the safe and effective treatment of individuals with serious mental disorders across a continuum of
 care.

(c) (1) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department may solicit proposals from, and may contract with, a county to help fund the development or expansion of pretrial diversion described in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, for the population described in subdivision (b) and that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Participants are individuals diagnosed with a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, and schizoaffective disorder, but excluding a primary diagnosis of antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia, and who are presenting non-substance-induced psychotic symptoms, who have been found incompetent
 to stand trial pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code.

(B) There is a significant relationship between the individual’s serious mental disorder and the charged offense, or between the individual’s conditions of homelessness and the charged offense.

(C) The individual does not pose an unreasonable risk of danger to public safety, as defined in Section 1170.18 of the Penal Code, if treated in the community.

(2) A county submitting a proposal for funding under this chapter shall designate a lead entity to apply for the funds. This lead entity shall show in its proposal that it has support from other county entities or other relevant entities, including courts, that are necessary to provide successful diversion of individuals under the
 contract.

(d) When evaluating proposals from the county, the department shall prioritize proposals that demonstrate all of the following:

(1) Provision of clinically appropriate or evidence-based mental health treatment and wraparound services across a continuum of care, as appropriate, to meet the individual needs of the diversion participant. For purposes of this section, “wraparound services” means services provided in addition to the mental health treatment necessary to meet the individual’s needs for successfully managing the individual’s mental
 health symptoms and to successfully live in the community. Wraparound services provided by the diversion program shall include appropriate housing, intensive case management, and substance use disorder treatment, and may include, without limitation, forensic assertive community treatment teams, crisis residential services, criminal justice coordination, peer support, and vocational support.

(2) Collaboration between community stakeholders and other partner government agencies in the diversion of individuals with serious mental disorders.

(3) Connection of individuals to services in the community after they have completed diversion as provided in this chapter.

(e) The department may also provide funding in the contract with the county, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the cost of providing
 postbooking assessment of defendants who are likely to be found incompetent to stand trial on felony charges to determine whether the defendant would benefit from diversion as included in the contract.

(f) The department may also provide funding in the contract with the county, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the cost of in-jail treatment prior to the placement in the community for up to an average of 15 days for defendants who have been approved by the court for diversion as included in the contract.

(g) A county contracted pursuant to this chapter shall report data and outcomes to the department, within 30 days after the end of each month, regarding those individuals targeted by the contract and in the program. This subdivision does not preclude the department from specifying reporting formats or from modifying, reducing, or adding data elements or outcome
 measures from a contracting county, as needed to provide for reporting of effective data and outcome measures. Notwithstanding any other law, but only to the extent not prohibited by federal law, the county shall provide specific patient information to the department for reporting purposes. The patient information is confidential and is not open to public inspection. A contracting county shall, at a minimum, report all of the following:

(1) The number of individuals that the court ordered to postbooking diversion and the length of time for which the defendant has been ordered to diversion.

(2) The number of individuals participating in diversion.

(3) The name, social security number, criminal identification and information (CII) number, date of birth, and demographics of each individual participating in the program.
 This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(4) The length of time in diversion for each participating individual. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(5) The types of services and supports provided to each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(6) The number of days each individual was in jail prior to placement in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(7) The number of days that each individual spent in each level of care facility. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(8) The
 diagnoses of each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(9) The nature and felony or misdemeanor classification of the charges for each individual participating in diversion. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(10) The number of individuals who completed diversion.

(11) The name, social security number, CII number, and birth date of each individual who did not complete diversion and the reasons for not completing. This information is confidential and is not open to public inspection.

(h) Contracts awarded pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and are not
 subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(i) The funds shall not be used to supplant existing services or services reimbursable from an available source but rather to expand upon them or support new services for which existing reimbursement may be limited.

(j) (1) Beginning July 1, 2021, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department may amend contracts with a county to fund the expansion of an existing department-funded pretrial diversion as described in Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, for the population described in subdivision (b) and that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) All participants identified for potential diversion are found incompetent to stand trial on a felony charge.

(B) Participants diverted through a program expansion suffer from a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, excluding antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia.

(2) Counties expanding their programs under this section will not be required to meet any additional match funding requirements.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the state hospitals and the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(l) The department shall have access to the arrest
 records and state summary of criminal history of defendants who are participating or have participated in the diversion program. The information may be used solely for the purpose of looking at the recidivism rate for those patients.

(m) If the defendant is committed directly to a county program in lieu of commitment to the department, counties shall provide the minute order from the court documenting the incompetent to stand trial finding on a felony charge and the original alienist evaluation associated with that finding.

(n) For department-funded diversion programs funded through appropriations made by the Budget Act of 2018 or new county programs funded through the Budget Act of 2021, participants in those county programs may include individuals diagnosed with schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder, or bipolar disorder, who are likely to be found incompetent to stand trial
 for felony charges, pursuant to Section 1368 of the Penal Code, or who have been found incompetent to stand trial pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, until new funds are dispersed to the county. Counties shall continue to comply with all terms of the contract signed with the department, including matching fund and data reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 23.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.7. State Department of State Hospitals: Contracting Facilities [4361.5. - 4361.7.]

4361.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “department” means the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 353.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4361.6.

(a) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this express purpose, the department may contract as follows:

(1) For subacute bed capacity, including, but not limited to, institutions for mental disease, mental health rehabilitation centers, skilled nursing facilities, or any other treatment options, such as community-based restoration of competency services, to address the increasing number of patient referrals to the department.

(2) With private or public entities to house and treat individuals committed to the department pursuant to Sections 1026, 1370, and 2972 of the Penal Code or Section 5358 of this code. Contracted funds may include any of the following:

(A) Program implementation costs.

(B) Construction costs, including funds for projects to build new facilities or modify, expand, or retrofit an existing space.

(C) One-time purchases of patient and staff furnishings and minor equipment.

(D) Activities related to recruitment and training of staff before program activation.

(E) Operating expenses.

(b) Contracts awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements contained in Section 19130 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, Section 4101.5 of this code, and the State Administrative Manual. These contracts shall not be subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other
 similar instruction, as necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 13.   (AB 204)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4361.7.

(a) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this express purpose, the department may contract for medical, evaluation, and other services as necessary to facilitate early access to treatment for individuals in county jails who have been deemed incompetent to stand trial on a felony charge.

(b) County jails shall allow the department and any of its contractors or designees reasonable access to its facilities and individuals deemed incompetent to stand trial on a felony charge to provide early access treatment.

(c) The department may petition for and participate in involuntary medication hearings pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code for individuals housed in county
 jails who are being treated by department employees or contractors. Nothing in this section shall remove the ability or responsibility of a jail to utilize existing authority to seek an involuntary medication order for individuals or to provide other medical or mental health care.

(d) Contracts awarded pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the requirements contained in Section 19130 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, Section 4101.5 of this code, and the State Administrative Manual. These contracts are not subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 57.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. State Program Of Problem Gambling [4369. - 4369.4.]

4369.

There is within the State Department of Public Health, the Office of Problem Gambling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 27.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4369.1.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Affected individual” means a person who experiences adverse psychiatric or physical impacts due to another person’s gambling disorder.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(c) “Gambling disorder” means a condition that causes the person to be unable to resist impulses to gamble, which can lead to harmful negative consequences, and that meets the diagnostic criteria set forth in the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition. Gambling disorder includes both
 pathological and problem gambling behavior.

(d) “Office” means the Office of Problem Gambling.

(e) “Prevention program” means a program designed to reduce the prevalence of gambling disorders among California residents. The program shall include, but is not limited to, public education and awareness, outreach to high-risk populations, early identification and responsible gambling programs.

(f) “Treatment program” means a program designed to assist individuals who experience harmful negative consequences related to gambling disorders. This program shall include, but is not limited to, training and educating providers, establishing a provider network for the provision of treatment services, and conducting research to ensure the delivery of evidence-based practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 28.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4369.2.

(a) The office shall develop a gambling disorder prevention program, which shall consist of all of the following:

(1) A toll-free telephone service for immediate crisis management with subsequent referrals of gamblers and affected individuals to health providers at various levels of care who can provide treatment for gambling disorders and related problems and to self-help groups.

(2) Public awareness campaigns that focus on prevention and education among the general public including, for example, dissemination of youth oriented preventive literature, educational experiences, and public service announcements in the
 media.

(3) Empirically driven research programs focusing on epidemiology/prevalence, etiology/causation, and best practices in prevention and treatment.

(4) Training of health care professionals and educators, and training for law enforcement agencies and nonprofit organizations in the identification of gambling disorders and knowledge of referral services and treatment programs.

(5) Training of gambling industry personnel in identifying customers at risk for gambling disorders and knowledge of referral and treatment services.

(b) The office shall develop a treatment program for California residents who have a gambling disorder or who are affected individuals. The treatment program may consist of all of the following components:

(1) Training for licensed health providers, including screening and assessment of gambling disorders, the use of evidence-based treatment modalities, and the administrative practices for treatment services implemented under this chapter.

(2) A network of licensed health providers authorized to receive reimbursement from the state for the provision of treatment services. This network may be created through partnerships with established health or substance use disorder facilities or individuals in private practice that can provide treatment for gambling disorders. State funded treatment services may include, but are not limited to, the following: self-administered, home-based educational programs; telephone counseling; group treatment; outpatient treatment; and inpatient residential treatment when medically necessary.

(3) A research program to conduct studies and develop evidence-based tools for use in treating gambling disorders.

(4) A funding allocation methodology that ensures treatment services are delivered efficiently and effectively to areas of the state most in need.

(5) Appropriate review and monitoring of the treatment program by the director of the office or a designated institution, including grant oversight and monitoring of contracts, the standards for treatment, and outcome monitoring.

(6) Treatment efforts shall provide services that are relevant to the needs of a diverse multicultural population with attention to groups with unique needs, including female gamblers, underserved ethnic groups, the elderly, and the physically challenged.

(c) The office shall make information available as requested by the Governor and the Legislature with respect to the comprehensive program.
